en: Frozen sandwiches
de: Tiefkühlsandwiches
es: Bocadillos congelados
fr: Sandwichs surgelés
hr: Smrznuti sendviči
it: Panini surgelati
nl: Bevroren broodjes
pt: Sanduíches congelados
ru: Замороженные бутерброды

en: Club sandwiches, Sandwich made with loaf bread, Club sandwich, Clubhouse sandwiches
am: ክለብ ሳንድዊች
ar: شطيرة النادي
da: Club sandwicher, Club sandwich
de: Club-Sandwich
el: Κλαμπ σάντουιτς
eo: Klubsandviĉoj
es: Sándwich de pan de molde, sándwich club, Club sandwich
fa: ساندویچ کلاب
fr: Sandwich club, sandwich triangle, sandwich pain de mie, Club sandwich
hr: Sendvič od pogače
hu: Klubszendvics
hy: Քլաբ սենդվիչ
id: Roti lapis klub
it: Tramezzino, sandwich club, Club sandwich
ja: アメリカンクラブハウスサンド
jv: Club roti isi
ko: 클럽 샌드위치
nb: Club sandwicher
nl: Club sandwich, Clubsandwich, sandwich met witbrood
nn: Club sandwichar
ru: Клубный сэндвич
sr: Клуб сендвич
sv: Club sandwichar
tr: Kulüp sandviç
uk: Клубний сендвіч
ur: کلب سینڈوچ
uz: Klab-sendvich
zh: 俱乐部三明治

fr: Sandwichs polaires, sandwich polaire, sandwichs au pain polaire
de: Polar-Sandwiches, Polar-Sandwich, Sandwichs mit Polarbrot
es: Bocadillos polares, bocadillo polar, bocadillos con pan polar
it: Panini polari, panino polare, panini fatti con pane polare
nl: Poolse broodjes, poolse sandwich, broodjes op poolbrood

en: Baguette sandwiches, French bread sandwiches, Sandwiches on French bread, Sandwiches made with French bread, Sandwich made with French bread, Baguette sandwich
da: Baguette-sandwicher
de: Baguette-Sandwiches, Sandwiches auf Baguette, Sandwiches mit Baguette
es: Bocadillos de pan francés, Bocadillos en pan francés, Bocadillos hechos con pan francés
fr: Sandwich baguette
hr: Sendviči s francuskim kruhom
it: Panini al pane francese, Panini su pane francese, Panini fatti con pane francese
nl: Broodjes op Frans brood, Broodjes gemaakt met Frans brood, Baguette broodjes
sv: Baguette sandwichar

en: Baguette sandwiches with salami and butter
de: Baguette-Sandwiches mit Salami und Butter
es: Bocadillos de baguette con salami y mantequilla
fr: Sandwichs baguette salami beurre
hr: Baguette sendviči sa salamom i maslacem
it: Panini baguette con salame e burro
nl: Stokbrood sandwiches met salami en boter

en: Baguette sandwiches with egg and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwich baguette oeuf crudités mayonnaise

en: Baguette sandwiches with ham and emmental cheese
de: Baguette-Sandwiches mit Schinken und Emmentaler Käse
es: Bocadillos de baguette con jamón y queso emmental
fr: Sandwichs baguette jambon emmental
hr: Baguette sendviči sa šunkom i ementalcem
it: Panini con prosciutto e formaggio emmental
nl: Broodjes met ham en emmentaler kaas

en: Baguette sandwiches with ham emmental cheese and butter
fr: Sandwich baguette jambon emmental beurre

en: Baguette sandwiches with hard-boiled egg and vegetables and butter
fr: Sandwich baguette jambon crudités oeuf, Sandwich baguette jambon oeuf dur crudités beurre

en: BLT sandwich, Baguette sandwiches with pork and vegetables and mayonnaise
fr: Sandwich baguette porc crudités mayonnaise

en: Bagel sandwiches
fr: Sandwichs bagel

en: Falafel sandwiches
es: Sándwiches de falafel
fr: Sandwichs aux falafels, Sandwiches de falafel
hr: Falafel sendviči
lt: Falafel sumuštiniai
nl: Falafelsandwiches

en: Doner kebab
de: Döner kebab
fr: Döner kebab
hr: Doner kebab
ja: ドネルケバブ
lt: Doner kebabas

en: Baguette kebab with vegetables
fr: Sandwich grec baguette, Kebab baguette

en: Paninis, Panninis
de: Panini
fr: Paninis
hr: Paninis
it: Panini tostati
ja: パニーニ
nl: Panini

en: Panini with cured ham mozzarella cheese and tomato
fr: Panini au jambon cru, Panini jambon cru mozzarella tomates

fr: Panini au poulet
nl: Kippaninis

en: Sandwich made with panini bread raw cured ham mozzarella cheese and tomato
fr: Sandwich panini jambon cru mozzarella tomates

en: Raw vegetable sandwiches, vegetable sandwiches
de: Sandwiches mit rohem Gemüse
fi: Raakakasvisvoileivät
fr: Sandwichs aux crudités
hr: Sendviči sa sirovim povrćem
nl: Rauwkostsandwiches

en: Burritos
de: Burritos
es: Burritos
fi: Burritot
fr: Burritos
hr: Buritosi
ja: ブリトー
nl: Burritos